Utah statutes.
72-2-105.   Budgetary accounts within Transportation Fund -- Disposition of unexpended balances.

(1)  The amount designated by the Legislature, out of which the items budgeted shall be paid, shall be established in appropriation and allotment accounts within the Transportation Fund.

(2)  At the close of the biennium all unexpended balances remaining in the accounts so budgeted shall be closed to the fund balance account of the Transportation Fund.

